Utah statutes.
13-25a-107.   Private action.

(1)  In addition to any other remedies, a person may bring an action in any state court of competent jurisdiction if:

(a) (i)  the person has received two or more telephone solicitations or facsimile advertisements from the same individual or entity that:

(A)  violates this chapter; or

(B)  violates Title 47 U.S.C. 227; and

(ii)  the person, following the first telephone solicitation or facsimile advertisement, notified the sender of the person's objection to receiving the telephone solicitation or facsimile advertisement; or

(b)  the person has received one telephone solicitation or facsimile advertisement in violation of:

(i)  Subsection 13-25a-103(1);

(ii)  Subsection 13-25a-103(3);

(iii)  Subsection 13-25a-103(5);

(iv)  Subsection 13-25a-103(6); or

(v)  Subsection 13-25a-104(1).

(2)  In a suit brought under Subsection (1), a person may:

(a)  recover the greater of $500 or the amount of the pecuniary loss, if any;

(b)  recover court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees as determined by the court; and

(c)  seek to enjoin any conduct in violation of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 263, 2003 General Session

